Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-182
Investigator, defined.

Investigator means an employee of the Nebraska Brand Committee who is also a deputy state sheriff and has the duty, responsibility, and authority to enforce all state statutes pertaining to brands, brand inspection, and associated livestock laws. An investigator is also responsible for the investigation of all problems associated with brands, brand inspection, and associated livestock enforcement problems.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 13.

Failure to give cautionary instruction with reference to testimony of investigator for Nebraska Brand Committee was not reversible error. State v. Nelson, 182 Neb. 31, 152 N.W.2d 10 (1967).